Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1963.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1517(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1517. Medical Advisory Board.(a) Membership.--There shall be a Medical Advisory Board consisting of [13] 14 members appointed by the secretary. The board shall be composed of an authorized representative from the Department of Transportation, [Department of Justice] OFFICE OF GENERAL COUNSEL, Governor's Council on Drug and Alcohol Abuse, Department of Health, Pennsylvania State Police and professionals as follows: One neurologist, one doctor of cardiovascular disease, one doctor of internal medicine, one <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 general practitioner, one ophthalmologist, one psychiatrist, one orthopedic surgeon [and], one optometrist and one certified driving rehabilitation specialist .* * *(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "certified driving rehabilitation specialist" means an individual who plans, develops, coordinates and implements driver rehabilitation services for individuals with disabilities and is certified by a national organization that assesses knowledge and skills in the services.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1963PN2598 - 2 - <--1234567891011